Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.07
Child support; withholding of earnings; attorney's fee.

The court may award a reasonable attorney's fee to the applicant for the services of the applicant's attorney in obtaining the order to withhold and transmit earnings. Such fee shall be reasonably related to the time spent by the attorney in obtaining such order and not to the amounts collected or to be collected pursuant to such order. If the court awards an attorney's fee, it shall provide that such fee shall be paid from that portion of the amounts withheld and transmitted to the clerk of the court which the court designates as the attorney fee award.

Laws 1974, LB 1015, § 12.